Louisiana, session 2026, HB456.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1311 and 1314(E)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1311. Contents of petition
The petition required under Section 1310.3 by R.S. 23:1310.3 shall set forth
all of the following:
(1) The names and addresses of the parties.
(2) A statement of the time, place, nature, and cause of the injury, or such
any other fairly equivalent information as will that would put the employer parties
on notice with respect to the identity of the parties.
(3) Sufficient factual statements to fairly put the parties on notice
concerning the The specific compensation benefit which is alleged to be due
pursuant to this Chapter, but which has not been paid, or is not being provided, or
the entitlement to which is disputed.
(4) A prayer for relief including a concise statement of specific benefits
or other relief sought by the petitioner.
* * *
§1314. Necessary allegations; dismissal of premature petition; dispute of benefits
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 456 ENROLLED
E.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the employer
or payor shall be permitted to file a disputed claim against an employee, his
dependent, or his beneficiary only when the employer or payor alleges the
employee, his dependent, or beneficiary has committed fraud as provided in R.S.
23:1208 which caused the employer or payor to pay a benefit which was not due
to the employee, his dependent, or beneficiary; or when the employer or payor is
an aggrieved party appealing a decision of the medical director pursuant to R.S.
23:1203.1(K) to controvert benefits or concerning any other dispute arising
pursuant to this Chapter.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.